Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 08. Investment Securities.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.05.612

— 45.05.688.
Renumbered in 1980. To determine the former number of a particular section, see the Tables of Sections Amended in volume 11.

Cross references. —

For inapplicability of the amendments made to this chapter by ch. 35, SLA 1993, to rights and obligations arising under this chapter before January 1, 1994, see § 129(a), ch. 35, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts; see also AS

01.10.100

. For inapplicability of amendments made to this chapter by ch. 17, SLA 1996 to actions or proceedings commenced before January 1, 1997, see § 69(a), ch. 17, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Collateral references. —

What is a “security” under UCC Art. 8, 11 ALR4th 1036.